Hawaii, session 2026, SB1640.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that access to emergency air transportation is critical to ensuring public safety and responding effectively to urgent situations.  In cases where no other air services are available, the lack of a dependable charter air service can impede disaster response, public safety operations, and essential state functions. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to require the air carrier commission to enter into a contract with a qualified charter air service provider to secure emergency air transportation services. SECTION 2. Chapter 261E, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated and to read as follows: "§261E-    Emergency charter air services.  (a) The commission shall enter into a contract with a qualified charter air service provider to ensure the availability of emergency air transportation in cases of emergency when no other air transportation service is available. (b)  The contract shall require the qualified charter air service provider to: (1)  Provide services within twenty-four hours of receiving notice from the commission; (2)  Provide a minimum of five flights per month for emergency purposes; and (3)  Maintain all certifications, licenses, and insurance required by state and federal law. (c) Any department or agency of the State may utilize the qualified charter air service provider for emergency air transportation.  Any department or agency utilizing the charter air service provider shall reimburse the commission for the cost of the flight services, as determined by the terms of the contract. (d) The commission shall adopt rules pursuant to chapter 91 necessary to carry out the purposes of this section, including but not limited to the procedures for requesting and reimbursing the costs of charter air services." SECTION 3. There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2025-2026 and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 for the air carrier commission to enter into a contract with a qualified charter air service provider to provide emergency air transportation in accordance with section 2 of this Act. The sums appropriated shall be expended by the department of transportation for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 4. New statutory material is underscored. SECTION 5. This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2025. INTRODUCED BY: _____________________________